District of Columbia statutes.
31-3138

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to any individual and group health benefits plan issued or renewed in the District of Columbia. Health insurers shall comply with this chapter on the earlier of October 16, 2002, or the effective date of the claims payment standards in section 1173 of the Social Security Act, approved August 14, 1935 (110 Stat. 2024; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d-2).

(b)

Section 31-3132 shall apply to claims received on or after October 16, 2002.

(c)

Section 31-3133 shall apply to retroactive denials made on or after October 16, 2002.

(d)

Section 31-3134 shall apply to any contract issued or renewed on or after October 16, 2002.

(e)

Section 31-3135 shall apply to claims data collected beginning with the first full calendar year following July 23, 2002. A health insurer shall include this data in the annual report filed with the Commissioner beginning on March 15, 2004.

History

July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-176, § 9, 49 DCR 5086